Utah statutes.
32B-1-205.   Falsifying or taking other actions with records prohibited.

(1)  A person required to make or maintain a record under this title or rules of the commission, or a person acting for that person, may not knowingly forge, falsify, alter, cancel, destroy, conceal, or remove the record for the purpose of deceiving the commission, a commissioner, the director, the department, a department employee, or a law enforcement officer.

(2)  A violation of this section may result in:

(a)  disciplinary action in accordance with Chapter 3, Disciplinary Actions and Enforcement Act, if the person who violates this section is a person subject to administrative action; or

(b)  criminal prosecution if the violation is a criminal offense under Chapter 4, Criminal Offenses and Procedure Act.

